ro-RO: Disciplina de softball: Fastpitch softball; Slowpitch softball; Altele
pl: Dyscyplina softballu: Fastpitch softball; Slowpitch softball; Inne
it: Disciplina del softball: Fastpitch softball; Slowpitch softball; Altro
de: Softball-Disziplin: Fastpitch-Softball; Slowpitch-Softball; Sonstiges
hu: Softball-szabályzat: Gyorsdobású softball; Lassúdobású softball; Egyéb
cs: Softbalová disciplína: Fastpitch softball; Slowpitch softball; Jiné
tr: Softbol disiplini: Hızlı softbol; Yavaş softbol; Diğer
fr: Discipline de softball: Softball lancer rapide; Softball lancer lent; Autre
pt-PT: Disciplina de softball: Softbol Fastpitch; Softbol Slowpitch; Outro
ru: Дисциплина софтбола: Софтбол Fastpitch; Софтбол Slowpitch; Другое
lt-LT: Softbolo šaka: „Fastpitch“ softbolas; „Slowpitch“ softbolas; Kita
ja: ソフトボールの規律: ファーストピッチソフトボール; スローピッチソフトボール; その他
es: Disciplina de sóftbol: Softbol de lanzamiento rápido; Softbol de lanzamiento lento; Otros
nb: Softballdisiplin: Fastpitch softball; Slowpitch softball; Annet
ko: 소프트볼 훈련: 패스트피치 소프트볼; 슬로우피치 소프트볼; 기타
nl: Discipline softbal: Fastpitch-softbal; Slowpitch-softbal; Andere
hr-HR: Softbolska disciplina: Fastpitch softbol; Slowpitch softbol; Ostalo
en: Softball discipline: Fastpitch softball; Slowpitch softball; Other
bg-BG: Софтболна дисциплина: Бърз софтбол; Бавен софтбол; Други
sl-SI: Disciplina softballa: Fastpitch softball; Slowpitch softball; Drugo
da: Softballdisciplin: Fastpitch softball; Slowpitch softball; Andet
el: Παραλλαγή σόφτμπολ: Σόφτμπολ με γρήγορο γήπεδο; Σόφτμπολ σε αργό γήπεδο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Softbalová disciplína: Softbal Fastpitch; Softbal Slowpitch; Iné
vi: Môn bóng mềm: Bóng mềm lối chơi nhanh; Bóng mềm lối chơi chậm; Khác
pt-BR: Modalidade de softbol: Fastpitch; Slowpitch; Outro
zh-TW: 壘球訓練: 快速壘球; 慢速壘球; 其他
fi: Softball-kuri: Fastpitch softball; Fastpitch softball; Muu
sv: Disciplin inom softboll: Fastpitch softball; Slowpitch softball; Övrigt
zh-CN: 垒球纪律: 快速投球垒球; 慢速投球垒球; 其他
th: รูปแบบกีฬาซอฟท์บอล: ซอฟต์บอลแบบฟาสต์พิตช์; ซอฟต์บอลแบบสโลว์พิตช์; อื่นๆ